Hawaii statutes.
§439-15 License, fees. (a) The board
shall issue a license as a beauty operator, or instructor, as the case may be,
to each person who passes the required examination, pays the proper fees, and
meets all of the other requirements of this chapter. The license shall state
specifically the licensure category for which the person is licensed and shall
be signed by the chairperson and executive secretary and impressed with the
seal of the board.

(b) All licenses issued by the board shall
expire on December 31 of each odd-numbered year.

(c) Every licensed beauty operator and
instructor shall pay to the board by December 31 of each odd-numbered year a
biennial renewal fee. The payment of the renewal fee shall entitle the
licensee to renewal of the license.

(d) Failure or refusal to renew the license by
December 31 of each odd-numbered year shall constitute a forfeiture of the
license. The license shall be restored upon payment of all delinquent fees and
a penalty fee if application is made within three years after lapse; provided
that the board may consider restoration beyond this period as prescribed by
rules of the board. [L 1949, c 397, pt of §1; am L 1955, c 198, §4; RL 1955,
§59-16; am L 1961, c 142, §2(d), (e); HRS §439-15; am L 1975, c 118, §5; am L
1983, c 210, §9; am L 1984, c 7, §11; am L 1987, c 154, §15; am L 1989, c 153,
§8; am L 1992, c 202, §41; am L 2004, c 13, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next